Montana, session 2025, SB467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 52-2-702, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-702. Purpose -- findings -- legislative intent. (1) The purpose of this part is to assure ensure
that children requiring day care be provided such the food, shelter, security and safety, guidance and direction,
nurture and comfort, and learning experiences commensurate to their ages and capabilities so as to safeguard
the growth and development of such the children, thereby facilitating their proper physical and emotional
maturation.
(2) (a) The legislature finds that the number of children living in homes where both parents work or
in homes with a single parent who works has increased dramatically over the last decade.
(b) The legislature finds that the availability of quality child care is critical to the self-sufficiency and
independence of Montana families, including the growing number of mothers who have young children and who
work out of economic necessity.
(c) The legislature further finds that the number of quality child-care arrangements falls far short of
the number required for children in need of child-care services.
(d) It is the intent of the legislature that the state promote day care for the purposes of:
(i) improving the quality of, and coordination among, child-care programs and providing additional
resources for child-care services;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 467

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 467.1
(ii) promoting the availability and diversity of quality child-care services for all children and families
that need such services;
(iii) providing assistance to families whose financial resources are not sufficient to enable them to
pay the full costs of necessary child-care services;
(iv) ensuring that parents are not forced by lack of available programs or financial resources to
place a child in an unsafe or unhealthy child-care facility; and
(v) assisting people in finding and maintaining employment by lessening the stress related to the
lack of adequate child care.
(e) It is the intent of the legislature that nothing in this part may be construed or applied to usurp or
infringe on the moral and legal rights and responsibilities of parents."

Section 2. Section 52-2-703, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-703. Definitions. In this part, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Child" means a person under 13 years of age or a person with special needs, as defined by
the department, who is under 18 years of age or is 18 years of age and a full-time student expected to complete
an educational program by who is under 19 years of age and is physically or mentally incapable of independent
self-care.
(2) "Day care" or "child care" means care for children provided by an adult, other than a parent of
the children or other person living with the children as a parent, on a regular or irregular basis, as applicable, for
daily periods of less than 24 hours, whether that care is for daytime or nighttime hours.
(3) (a) "Day-care center" means an out-of-home place in which day care is provided to 16 or more
children on a regular or irregular basis.
(b) The term does not include a place where day care is provided if a parent of a child for whom
day care is provided remains on the premises.
(4) "Day-care facility" means a person, association, or place, incorporated or unincorporated, that
provides day care on a regular basis or a place licensed or registered to provide day care on an irregular basis,
as provided for in subsection (3)(a), or for children suffering from illness. The term includes a family day-care
home, a day-care center, a group day-care home, or a facility providing care in a child's home for the purpose
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 467

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 467.1
of meeting registration requirements for the receipt of payments as provided in 52-2-713. The term does not
include:
(a) a person who limits care to children who are related to the person by blood or marriage or
under the person's legal guardianship, unless registration or licensure as a day-care facility is required to
receive payments as provided in 52-2-713; or
(b) any group facility established chiefly for educational purposes that limits its services to children
who are 3 years of age or older.
(5) "Department" means the department of public health and human services provided for in 2-15-
2201.
(6) "Family day-care home" means a private residence in which day care is provided to three to
eight children on a regular basis.
(7) "Family, friend, or neighbor provider" means a child-care provider who provides regular care for
no more than six children from separate families or all children from a sibling group and who opts to be
registered.
(7) (8) "Group day-care home" means a private residence or other structure in which day care is
provided to 9 to 15 children on a regular basis.
(8) (9) "License" means a written document issued by the department that the license holder has
complied with this part and the applicable standards and rules for day-care centers.
(9) (10) "Licensee" means the holder of a license issued by the department in accordance with the
provisions of this part.
(11) "Parent" means a person who:
(a) is related to a child who is the son or daughter of the person by blood, marriage, or adoption;
(b) is a legal guardian of a child; or
(c) is standing in loco parentis to a child.
(10) (12) "Professional training" means training for early childhood or school-age care providers
that is recognized as professional development by a national education or certification organization or by a
higher education institution.
(11) (13) "Registrant" means the holder of a registration certificate issued by the department in
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 467

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 467.1
accordance with the provisions of this part.
(12) (14) "Registration" means the process whereby the department maintains a record of all
family day-care homes and group day-care homes, prescribes standards, promulgates rules, and requires the
operator of a family day-care home or a group day-care home to certify compliance with the prescribed
standards and promulgated rules.
(13) (15) "Registration certificate" means a written instrument issued by the department to
publicly document that the certificate holder has, in writing, certified to the department compliance with this part
and the applicable standards for family day-care homes and group day-care homes.
(14) (16) "Regular basis" means providing day care to children of separate families for any daily
periods of less than 24 hours and within 3 or more consecutive weeks.
(15) (17) (a) "Related by blood or marriage" means the status of a child who is the son,
daughter, brother, sister, first cousin, nephew, niece, or grandchild of a person providing child care.
(b) The term includes the status of a child described in subsection (15)(a) (17)(a) in a step or
adoptive relationship.
(16) (18) "School age" means a person who is at least 5 years of age and who is younger than
13 years of age or a person with special needs, as defined by the department, who is under 18 years of age or
is 18 years of age and a full-time student expected to complete an educational program by 19 years of age.
(17) (19) "School-age care" means an adult-supervised program that is provided for school-age
children during nonschool hours."

Section 3. Section 52-2-722, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-722. Application for a license or registration certificate. (1) Application for a license or
registration certificate shall must be made to the department in the county in which the applicant lives on forms
prescribed by the department.
(2) Applications for a license or registration certificate by Indians residing on Indian reservations
shall must be made through the tribal governing body on forms prescribed by the department. Applications
made through a tribal governing body shall must be accompanied by a request by the tribal governing body that
the department investigate to determine whether a license or registration certificate should be granted.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 467

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 467.1
(3) Within 30 days of receipt of the application, the department shall determine whether a license
or registration certificate should be issued."

Section 4. Section 52-2-723, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-723. Requirements for licensure. (1) The department shall include in the minimum standards
for day-care centers the following requirements:
(a) The applicant, the applicant's employees, and all those persons who will come in direct contact
with the children are of good character and shall provide satisfactory results of a background check.
(b) The staff of the day-care facility is sufficient in number as provided by rule to provide adequate
supervision and care of the children in the facility.
(c) Essential programs and practices carried on by the facility staff are developed and carried out
with due regard for the protection of the health, safety, development, and well-being of the children.
(d) Applicant and staff are qualified by practical experience or education or training to give good
care and treatment to the children.
(e) Intake records are kept on each child admitted for care.
(f) The applicant and staff limit admissions to the maximum number indicated on the current
license.
(g) The applicant will arrange for the necessary precautions to guard against communicable
diseases.
(h) Public liability insurance and fire insurance are currently in force for the protection of the
operator, the staff, and the facility.
(i) The ages and numbers of children that may be cared for in a day-care facility are specified.
(2) It is the duty of the department or its authorized representative to assist applicants in meeting
the minimum requirements."

Section 5. Section 52-2-725, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-725. Renewal license -- registration certificate. If a licensed or registered day-care facility
desires to renew a license or registration certificate, the request for renewal shall must be made in writing, on
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 467

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 467.1
forms prescribed by the department, in the county in which the applicant lives, 30 days prior to the expiration of
its license or registration certificate."

Section 6. Section 52-2-731, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-731. Standards for day care. (1) In developing standards, the department shall seek the
advice and assistance of the legislature, the superintendent of public instruction, representatives of day-care
facilities, specialists in child care, and representatives of parent groups who use the services of day-care
facilities. The standards may pertain to:
(1) (a) character, suitability, and qualifications of an applicant and other persons directly responsible
for the care of children;
(2) (b) the number of individuals or staff required for adequate supervision and care of children in day-
care facilities;
(3) (c) child-care programs and practices necessary to ensure the health, safety, safety in
transportation, development, and well-being of children;
(4) (d) adequate and appropriate admission policies;
(5) (e) adequacy of physical facilities and equipment;
(6) (f) general financial ability and competence of an applicant to provide necessary care for children
and maintain prescribed standards;
(7) (g) the ages and numbers of children that may be cared for in a day-care facility.
(2) Administrative rules adopted by the department pursuant to the rulemaking authority granted
under this part must comply with the provisions of this part and may not be more stringent than the
requirements provided by law in this part."

Section 7. Section 52-2-732, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-732. Licensees or registrants to maintain records, furnish reports, and permit
inspections. It shall be the duty of every applicant for a license or for registration andevery licensee or
registrant to give the right of entrance to and inspection of premisesto representatives of the department at
reasonable times, to keep and maintainsuch records as the department may prescribe, to permit inspection of
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 467

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 467.1
these records, and to report to the department such facts as may be required on forms furnished by the
department. An applicant for a license or registration, a licensee, or a registrant shall give the department the
right to enter and inspect the premises at reasonable times and to inspect records. A licensee or registrant shall
keep and maintain records as required by the department and report facts as required on forms furnished by
the department. Information maintained by a licensee or registrant about the children in the care of the licensee
or registrant must be treated as confidential and may be reviewed by the department but may not be copied or
removed without a parent's written consent."

Section 8. Section 52-2-735, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-735. Health protection -- certification required rulemaking. (1) The department shall adopt
rules for the protection of children in day-care centers from the health hazards of inadequate food preparation,
poor nutrition, and communicable diseases. Rules adopted by the department must include rules requiring
children under 5 years of age to be immunized against Haemophilus influenza type "b" before being admitted
for care in the facility unless an exemption has been claimed as provided in 20-5-405.
(2) Local public health authorities shall arrange to provide training to day-care center providers and
employees regarding health hazards. Upon successful completion of the training the local public health
authorities shall issue certificates to the providers and employees.
(3) In lieu of training, local public health authorities may elect to inspect facilities and issue
certificates of approval to child-care center providers.
(4) Each applicant for a license to operate a day-care center shall submit to the department a
certificate issued pursuant to subsection (2) or (3) before the department will issue a license.
(5) The local public health authority may charge the applicant a reasonable fee, not to exceed $25,
for any inspection necessary to issue a certificate of approval, or a fee not to exceed the documented cost for
training it provides under this section."

Section 9. Section 52-2-737, MCA, is amended to read:
"52-2-737. Group day-care home -- staffing requirement. There must be at least two caregivers
caring for the children at all times when there are more than eight children present at a group day-care home
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 467

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 467.1
except during periods of approved overlap care."

NEW SECTION. Section 10. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – SB 467